Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1970YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 808 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.14 Managed care organizations 1 ââ chargebacks. 2 1. A managed care organization acting pursuant to a contract 3 with the department to administer the medical assistance 4 program under this chapter shall not issue a chargeback to a 5 provider more than twelve months from the date the managed care 6 organization provided reimbursement to the provider. 7 2. A managed care organization acting pursuant to a 8 contract with the department to administer the medical 9 assistance program under this chapter shall negotiate a fee 10 with a third-party auditor prior to the third-party auditor 11 initiating an audit of a provider on behalf of the managed 12 care organization. A managed care organization shall not base 13 the managed care organizationâs compensation to a third-party 14 auditor on the percentage of chargebacks identified by the 15 third-party auditor. 16